North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Voluntary Dissolution.

§ 55-14-01.
Dissolution by incorporators or directors.

The board of directors or, if the corporation has no directors, a majority of the incorporators of a corporation that has not issued shares may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

(1a)

The names and addresses of its officers, if any;

(1b)

The names and addresses of its directors, if any, or if none, the names and addresses of its incorporators;

The date of its incorporation;

That none of the corporation’s shares has been issued;

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

Reserved for future codification purposes; and

That a majority of the incorporators or the board of directors authorized the dissolution.

A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 261/2; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.19.

§ 55-14-02.
Dissolution by board of directors and shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders.

The following requirements shall be met for a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:

The board of directors shall recommend to the shareholders that the proposal to dissolve be approved unless one of the following circumstances exist, in which event the board of directors shall communicate the basis for not recommending approval of the proposal to dissolve to the shareholders at the time it submits the proposal to dissolve to the shareholders:

The board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should not make a recommendation that the shareholders approve the proposal to dissolve.

G.S. 55-8-26

applies.

The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (e).

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting in accordance with

G.S. 55-7-05

. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation, a bylaw adopted by the shareholders, or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (c)) require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the proposal to dissolve to be adopted must be approved by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on that proposal.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 34; Rev., s. 1195; C.S., s. 1182; 1941, c. 195; G.S., s. 55-121; 1951, c. 1005, s. 4; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2013-153, s. 14.

§ 55-14-03.
Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized pursuant to

G.S. 55-14-02

, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

(1a)

The names and addresses of its officers;

(1b)

The names and addresses of its directors;

The date dissolution was authorized;

A statement that shareholder approval was obtained as required by this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 645, s. 10(c).

A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

For purposes of this Chapter, a dissolved corporation is a corporation whose articles of dissolution have become effective and includes a successor entity to which the remaining assets of the corporation are transferred subject to its liabilities for purposes of a liquidation.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 34; Rev., s. 1195; C.S., s. 1182; 1941, c. 195; G.S., s. 55-121; 1951, c. 1005, s. 4; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 10(c); 2005-268, s. 31.

§ 55-14-04.
Revocation of dissolution.

A corporation may revoke its dissolution within 120 days after its effective date.

Revocation of dissolution must be authorized in the same manner as the dissolution was authorized unless an authorization under

G.S. 55-14-02

permitted revocation by action of the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without shareholder action.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the corporation’s board of directors (or incorporators) revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

If the corporation’s board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the shareholders, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If shareholder action was required to revoke the dissolution, the information required by G.S. 55-14-03(a)(3) or (4) with respect to the revocation.

Revocation of dissolution is effective upon the effective date of the articles of revocation of dissolution.

When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred, subject to the rights of any person who reasonably relied to his prejudice upon the filing of the articles of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-14-05.
Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation does not:

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation’s share transfer records;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in Article 8;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

After the end of the tax year in which dissolution occurs, a dissolved corporation is not subject to the annual franchise tax unless it engages in business activities not appropriate to winding up and liquidating its business and affairs as permitted by subsection (a).

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, ss. 39, 40; c. 476, s. 193; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-14-06.
Known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved corporation shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation must receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation is barred:

If the corporation does not receive the claim by the deadline from a claimant who received written notice under subsection (b); or

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by written notice from the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the date of receipt of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, ss. 39, 40; c. 476, s. 193; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-14-07.
Unknown and certain other claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this State, its registered office) is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within five years after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within five years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under

G.S. 55-14-06

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on;

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, ss. 39, 40; c. 476, s. 193; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-14-08.
Enforcement of claims.

A claim under

G.S. 55-14-06

or

G.S. 55-14-07

may be enforced:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets, including coverage under any applicable insurance policy, or

Except as provided in G.S. 55-14-09(d), if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation to the extent of the shareholder’s pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to the shareholder in liquidation, whichever is less, but a shareholder’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the shareholder.

Nothing in

G.S. 55-14-06

or

G.S. 55-14-07

shall extend any applicable period of limitation.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, ss. 39, 40; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2005-268, s. 32.

North Carolina Commentary

This section contains the substance of subsection 14.07(d) of the Model Act and was added for the purpose of setting forth provisions applicable to claims covered by either

G.S. 55-14-06

or

G.S. 55-14-07

. The language of the Model Act was modified in subdivision (a)(1) to make clear that undistributed assets of a dissolved corporation include coverage under any applicable insurance policy.

Under subdivision (a)(2), a claim may be enforced against a shareholder to the extent of the lesser of his pro rata share thereof or the corporate assets distributed to him in liquidation. In no event may a shareholder’s total liability under this section exceed the total amount of assets distributed to him in liquidation. This subdivision, unlike former G.S. 55-54, makes a shareholder liable regardless of whether the distribution to him was made at a time when the corporation was unable to meet its obligations and regardless of whether he knew that the distribution violated this Act.

This section does not bring forward the provision in former G.S. 55-32(1) allowing creditors to enforce certain specified statutory liabilities in direct actions against directors. However, substantially the same relief should be available to creditors in insolvency proceedings and through attachment or similar procedures.

Supplemental North Carolina Commentary (2005)

Effective October 1, 2005, this section is amended to reflect that the liability of shareholders of a dissolved corporation may be limited by

G.S. 55-14-09

, which is added to the North Carolina Business Corporation Act effective October 1, 2005.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-268, s. 32, effective October 1, 2005, in subdivision (a)(2), inserted “Except as provided in G.S. 55-14-09(d)” and substituted “the shareholder’s” for “his” once and “the shareholder” for “him” twice.

§ 55-14-09.
Court proceedings.

A dissolved corporation that has published a notice under

G.S. 55-14-07

may file an application with the superior court of the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office, or its registered office if the corporation does not have a principal office in this State, is located for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payments of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved corporation or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved corporation, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution. Provisions need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under

G.S. 55-14-07(c)

.

Within 10 days after the filing of the application, notice of the proceeding shall be given by the dissolved corporation to each claimant holding a contingent claim whose contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved corporation.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved corporation.

Provision by the dissolved corporation for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection (a) of this section shall satisfy the dissolved corporation’s obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the dissolved corporation, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and the claims shall not be enforced against a shareholder who received assets in liquidation.

History.

2005-268, s. 33.

§§ 55-14-10 through 55-14-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.